Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1102.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XIX-BBUDGET IMPASSE REIMBURSEMENT PROGRAMSection 1901-B. Scope of article.This article relates to the Budget Impasse Reimbursement Program.Section 1902-B. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Budget impasse." The period between July 1, 2025, and November 12, 2025."Eligible entity." A school district, county, human services provider, prekindergarten provider, Head Start provider, nonprofit organization or any entity that receives funding from the Commonwealth, either directly or through a Commonwealth agency, in accordance with the act of November 12, 2025 (P.L. , No.1A), known as the General Appropriation Act of 2025, and received funding from the Commonwealth during the 2024-2025 fiscal year. The term does not include an entity that received funding from discretionary agency programs or competitive agency programs in the 2024-2025 fiscal year."Grant." A grant awarded under the program."Impasse-generated interest." Interest income accrued in the 20250SB1102PN1339 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930313233 General Fund as a result of delayed expenditures or transfers during the budget impasse."Office." The Office of the Budget of the Commonwealth."Program." The Budget Impasse Reimbursement Program established under this article."Restricted account." The Budget Impasse Reimbursement Restricted Account established under this article.Section 1903-B. Budget Impasse Reimbursement Program.(a) Establishment.--The Budget Impasse Reimbursement Program is established within the office.(b) Administration.--The office shall administer the program to reimburse eligible entities, in the form of grants, for documented financing costs or interest income lost by an eligible entity directly attributable to the budget impasse.(c) Application.--The office shall develop and make available an application for an eligible entity to apply for a grant.(d) Deadline for applications.--An application for a grant must be received by the office no later than 90 days after the effective date of this subsection.(e) Review.--The office shall review an application submitted for a grant and, if determined by the office to be eligible, shall award a grant to the eligible entity.(f) Amount of grant.--A grant to an eligible entity may not exceed the amount of financing costs or interest income lost by the eligible entity directly attributable to the budget impasse.(g) Guidelines.--The office shall develop and publish guidelines to implement this article.Section 1904-B. Budget Impasse Reimbursement Restricted Account.20250SB1102PN1339 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Establishment.--The Budget Impasse Reimbursement Restricted Account is established in the State Treasury. The money in the restricted account is appropriated on a continuing basis to the office for the purpose of paying grants.(b) Source of funding.--The restricted account shall consist of money transferred from the General Fund and the Budget Stabilization Reserve Fund as provided in this section.(c) Duty of State Treasurer.--Within 30 days of the effective date of this subsection, the State Treasurer shall calculate the amount of impasse-generated interest and report the amount to the office.(d) Transfers.--(1) Within 90 days of the effective date of this paragraph, an amount equal to the impasse-generated interest shall be transferred from the General Fund to the restricted account.(2) If the amount transferred under paragraph (1) is insufficient to pay grants to all eligible entities, the office shall calculate the amount of the insufficiency and shall report the amount to the State Treasurer. Upon receipt of the report from the office, the State Treasurer shall transfer the amount from the Budget Stabilization Reserve Fund to the restricted account.Section 1905-B. Reporting.The office shall submit a report on the program to the Governor, the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives. The report shall include:(1) The total amount of impasse-generated interest.20250SB1102PN1339 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The total amount awarded in grants.(3) The number and types of eligible entities that received a grant.(4) The methodology used to calculate the amount of a grant.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB1102PN1339 - 5 - 123456